North Dakota statutes. TITLE 61 Waters
CHAPTER 61-02 Water Commission
61-02-68.3.
Interim financing — Proper authority required.

Before entering into any loan agreement under section 61-02-68.2, the commission shall be satisfied by opinion of the attorney general, by an examination of relevant charters, resolutions, minutes, and other documents, or by other sufficient means that the owner or owners receiving such interim financing have the authority and power to construct the project or works, borrow these funds, and enter into the loan agreement. The commission shall also be so satisfied that all procedures, resolutions, and other things necessary to exercise such authority and power have been followed or properly performed.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 627, § 3.

61-02-68.4.
Interim financing — Independent review of feasibility of project.

Before issuing any interim financing notes pursuant to section 61-02-68.1, the commission shall conduct a review of the feasibility of the project or works to ensure that projected water consumption, operating costs, construction costs, revenues, and other statistics are reliable and that the project will be able to pay its expenses. The commission shall state the findings of its review in a motion entered in the minutes of its proceedings.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 627, § 4.

61-02-68.5.
Interim financing — Proceeds pledged as security — Assignment to commission of rights to proceeds.

Any interim financing agreement pursuant to section 61-02-68.2 shall provide that the owner or owners receiving the proceeds of such interim financing shall pledge and dedicate the proceeds of its loan or grant from the United States or the state as security for the interim financing notes issued pursuant to the loan agreement. In addition, the execution of any interim financing agreement under section 61-02-68.2 shall constitute an assignment to the commission of the right to receive the proceeds of the federal or state loan or grant so far as is necessary to secure the notes issued pursuant to the agreement and in preference to any other obligation whatsoever of the owner or owners receiving the interim financing. It shall not be necessary for the financing agreement, trust indentures, or any other document relating to the interim financing agreement to be filed or recorded in order for the assignment to the commission to be perfected.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 627, § 5.

61-02-68.6.
Terms of interim financing notes — Extension of maturity dates.

Any resolution authorizing the issuance of interim financing notes shall specify the principal amount, rate of interest, and maturity date, but not to exceed three years from the date of issue, and such other terms as may be specified in such resolutions. The time of payment of any such notes may be extended for a period of not exceeding two years from the maturity date thereof.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 627, § 6.

61-02-68.7.
Pledge of revenues to secure interim financing notes.

All interim financing notes and the interest thereon must be secured by a pledge of, and be payable from, any grant or loan to be made by an agency or instrumentality of the United States government or the state of North Dakota, as specified in section 61-02-68.2, and in connection with such project or works.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 627, § 7.

61-02-68.8.
Additional covenants and conditions to secure interim financing notes.

The commission, in order to further secure the payment of the interim financing notes, is authorized and empowered to make any other or additional covenants, terms, and conditions, and to do and perform such acts as may be necessary, convenient, or desirable in order to secure payment of its notes, and to make the notes more acceptable to lenders. Exercise of authority pursuant to this section shall be consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 627, § 8.

61-02-68.9.
Registration of interim financing notes — Interest payment — Redemption prior to maturity.

The commission may provide for the registration of interim financing notes in the name of the owner either as to principal alone, or as to both principal and interest, on such terms and conditions as the commission may determine by the resolution authorizing their issue. Interest on the notes may be made payable semiannually, annually, or at maturity, however, the first interest payment period may be less than six months. The notes may be made redeemable, prior to maturity, at the option of the commission, in the manner and upon the terms fixed by the resolution authorizing their issuance.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 627, § 9.

61-02-68.10.
Execution and attestation of interim financing notes — Sale.

The interim financing notes must be executed by the chairman or the vice chairman of the commission and attested by the signature of the director of the department of water resources. The signature of the chairman or vice chairman, and the director, and any other signatures on appurtenant coupons, may be facsimiles. The notes must be sold at private or public sale in the manner and at the rate of interest and price as the commission determines by resolution.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 627, § 10; 2021, ch. 488, § 40, effective August 1, 2021.

61-02-68.11.
Bond provisions applicable to interim financing notes.

The provisions of sections 61-02-49, 61-02-59, 61-02-60, 61-02-61, 61-02-62, and 61-02-65, relating to bonds also apply to notes issued pursuant to section 61-02-68.1.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 627, § 11; 1985, ch. 82, § 155.

61-02-68.12.
Interim financing notes or guarantees not a state obligation — Payment restricted to revenues — Notes or guarantees not a lien.

Interim financing notes issued by the commission under this chapter or guarantees provided under section 61-02-68.14, 61-02-68.15, 61-02-68.16, 61-02-68.17, 61-02-68.18, or 61-02-68.19 are not a debt or liability of this state and do not constitute a loan of the credit of this state or create any debt or debts, liability or liabilities on behalf of this state, or be or constitute a pledge of the faith and credit of this state, but all notes or guarantees are payable solely from funds pledged or available for their payment as authorized in this chapter. The notes or guarantees do not constitute a charge, lien, nor encumbrance, legal or equitable, upon any property of the commission, other than funds received pursuant to an interim financing agreement.

Each note issued under this chapter must recite in substance that the note, including interest thereon, is payable solely from a loan or grant to be made by an agency or instrumentality of the United States government, or North Dakota, and that the note does not constitute a debt of the commission within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limit.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 627, § 12; 1999, ch. 536, § 2.

61-02-68.13.
Interim financing notes as legal investments and security.

Notwithstanding any restrictions contained in any other law, this state and all public officers, boards and agencies, and political subdivisions and agencies thereof, all national banking associations, state banks, trust companies, savings banks and institutions, savings and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business, and all executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries, may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys, or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any interim financing notes issued by the commission pursuant to this chapter, and the notes are authorized security for any and all public deposits.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 627, § 13; 1983, ch. 319, § 35.

61-02-68.14.
Guarantee issued by commission.

The commission may guarantee evidences of indebtedness issued or other obligations undertaken by the owners of water projects eligible to receive municipal, rural, and industrial water supply funds pursuant to Pub. L. 99-294 [100 Stat. 418], or evidences of indebtedness issued or other obligations undertaken by a not-for-profit organization establishing a financing program for the owners of the water projects eligible to receive municipal, rural, and industrial water supply funds pursuant to Pub. L. 99-294 [100 Stat. 418] for the purpose of providing the owners with construction period financing. Construction period financing may include the cost of construction of works or projects, funding of debt service reserves and capitalized interest, and the payment of the costs of issuance. A commission guarantee of indebtedness or other obligations of an owner of a water project must be authorized by resolution of the commission and must be evidenced by a written agreement approved by the commission.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 536, § 3.

61-02-68.15.
Pledges.

The commission may pledge the municipal, rural, and industrial water supply funds authorized by Pub. L. 99-294 [100 Stat. 418] as security for a guarantee or note. A pledge is valid and binding whenever the pledge is made. The revenues or other moneys pledged and thereafter received by the commission are immediately subject to the lien of the pledge without physical delivery or further act, and the lien of the pledge is valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind against the commission, regardless of whether the parties have notice. Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be filed or recorded, except in the records of the commission.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 536, § 4.

61-02-68.16.
Reserve fund.

The commission shall establish and maintain a reserve fund in which there must be deposited all moneys appropriated by the legislative assembly for the purpose of the fund, all proceeds of notes issued or guaranteed by the commission required to be deposited in the fund by terms of a contract or a resolution of the commission with respect to the proceeds of notes, any moneys or funds of the commission that it determines to deposit in the fund, any moneys made available to the commission for the purposes of the fund from any other source, and any contractual right to the receipt of moneys by the commission for the purpose of the fund, including a letter of credit or similar instrument. Moneys in the reserve fund must be held and applied solely to the payment of the interest on and the principal of notes and sinking fund payments as they become due and payable and for the retirement of notes, including payment of any redemption premium required to be paid when any notes are redeemed or retired before maturity, and for the payment of principal and interest on evidences of indebtedness or obligations guaranteed by the commission. Moneys in the reserve fund may not be withdrawn if the withdrawal would reduce the amount in the reserve fund to an amount less than the required debt service reserve, except for payment of the interest due and payable on notes and the principal of notes maturing and payable and sinking fund payments and for the retirement of notes in accordance with the terms of a contract between the commission and its noteholders, for the payment of principal and interest on evidences of indebtedness or obligations of an owner of water projects for which a guarantee has been issued by the commission, and for payment of interest or principal or sinking fund payments or retirement of notes or draws upon a guarantee, for which other moneys of the commission are not then available in accordance with the terms of the contract. The reserve fund may not be used for the payment of a guarantee by the commission unless the commission has determined that notes of the commission cannot be issued under acceptable terms for the payment of the guarantee or that the payment of the guarantee will not reduce the reserve fund to an amount less than the required debt service reserve. The required debt service reserve must be an aggregate amount equal to at least the largest amount of money required by the terms of all contracts between the commission and its noteholders to be raised in the current or any succeeding calendar year for the payment of interest on and maturing principal of outstanding notes and the payment required by the terms of any contract to a sinking fund established for the payment or redemption of the notes.

If the establishment of the reserve fund for an issue or the maintenance of an existing reserve fund at a required level under this section would necessitate the investment of all or any portion of a new reserve fund or all or any portion of an existing reserve fund at a restricted yield, because to not restrict the yield may cause the notes to be taxable under the Internal Revenue Code, then at the discretion of the commission a reserve fund does not need be established before the issuance of notes or the reserve fund need not be funded to the levels required by other subsections of this section or an existing reserve fund may be reduced.

Notes may not be issued by the commission unless there is in the reserve fund the required debt service reserve for all notes then issued and outstanding and the notes to be issued. This chapter does not prevent or preclude the commission from satisfying this requirement by depositing so much of the proceeds of the notes to be issued, upon their issuance, as is needed to achieve the required debt service reserve. The commission may issue its notes for the purpose of providing an amount necessary to increase the amount in the reserve fund to the required debt service reserve, or to meet any higher or additional reserve as may be fixed by the commission with respect to the fund.

In order to assure the maintenance of the required debt service reserve, there must be appropriated by the legislative assembly and paid to the commission for deposit in the reserve fund any sum certified by the commission as necessary to restore the reserve fund to an amount equal to the required debt service reserve or to maintain a reserve fund established by the commission under this chapter and required according to the terms of a guarantee issued by the commission. The commission may approve a resolution for the issuance of notes, as provided by this chapter, which states in substance that this subsection is not applicable to the required debt service reserve for notes issued under that resolution.

If the maturity of a series of notes of the commission is not more than three years from the date of issuance of the notes, the commission may determine that no reserve fund need be established for that respective series of notes or that the reserve fund may be in an amount less than the required debt service reserve. If the determination is made, holders of that respective series of notes do not have an interest in or claim on existing reserve funds established for the security of the holders of previously issued commission notes, and do not have an interest in or claim on reserve funds established for the holders of subsequent issues of notes of the commission.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 536, § 5.

61-02-68.17.
Additional reserves and funds.

The commission may establish additional and further reserves or other funds or accounts as may be necessary, desirable, or convenient to further the accomplishment of the purposes of the commission to comply with the provisions of an agreement made by or a resolution of the commission.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 536, § 6.

61-02-68.18.
Protection of service during term of guarantee or loan.

The service provided or made available by owners of water projects through the construction or acquisition of an improvement, or the improvement revenues, financed in whole or in part with a guarantee or loan to the owners of water projects from the commission or any other state entity, may not be curtailed or limited by inclusion of all or any part of the area served by the owners of water projects within the boundaries of any other owners of water projects, or by the granting of any private franchise for similar service within the area served by the owners of water projects, during the term of the guarantee or loan. The owners of water projects providing the service may not be required to obtain or secure a franchise, license, or permit as a condition of continuing to serve the area if it is included within the boundaries of another owner of a water project during the term of the guarantee or loan.

Under the circumstances described in subsection 1, nothing prevents the two owners of water projects and the commission or other state entity from negotiating an agreement for the right or obligation to provide the service in question, provided that an agreement is invalid unless the commission or other state agency or enterprise is a party to the agreement and unless the agreement contains adequate safeguards to ensure the security and timely payment of any outstanding notes of the commission issued to fund the loan.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 536, § 7.

61-02-68.19.
Interim financing notes, guarantees, or bonds for municipal, rural, and industrial water supply projects — Public interest.

Guarantees made under section 61-02-68.14 or bonds or interim notes issued under this chapter for the purpose of providing construction period financing for owners of water projects eligible to receive municipal, rural, and industrial water supply funds pursuant to Pub. L. 99-294 [100 Stat. 418] are in the public interest and are not subject to the limitation contained in subsection 2 of section 61-02-46.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 536, § 8.

61-02-69.
Property of commission exempt from taxation.

All the property of the commission shall be exempt from taxation.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 30; 1939, ch. 256, § 30; R.C. 1943, § 61-0269.

61-02-70.
Expenses paid from administrative fund. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 447, § 24.

61-02-71.
Commission may accept and receive appropriations and contributions.

The commission may receive and accept appropriations and contributions from any source, either of money or property or things of value, to be held, used, and applied for the purposes provided for in this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 31; 1939, ch. 256, § 31; R.C. 1943, § 61-0271.

61-02-72.
Revenue bonds of commission are legal and valid investments of financial institutions — Exemption from taxation.

Notwithstanding any restrictions contained in any other law, the state and all public officers, boards, and agencies, and political subdivisions and agencies thereof, all national banking associations, state banks, trust companies, savings banks and institutions, savings and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business, and all executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries, may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys, or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds issued by the commission pursuant to this chapter, and the bonds are authorized security for public deposits. The bonds, and the interest thereon, are exempt from all state, county, and municipal taxes.

Source:

S.L. 1939, ch. 107, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 61-0272; S.L. 1983, ch. 319, § 36; 1983, ch. 676, § 37; 1985, ch. 82, § 156.

61-02-73.
Construction of chapter.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be deemed to interfere with any vested rights to the use of water. This chapter being necessary for the welfare of the state and its citizens, it shall be construed liberally to effect the purposes thereof.

Source:

S.L. 1939, ch. 256, § 33; R.C. 1943, § 61-0273.

61-02-74.
Certain moneys to be deposited in general fund. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 587, § 1.

61-02-75.
Hearing witnesses — Subpoena — Oath — Fees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 739, § 1.

61-02-76.
Hearing — Appeals from decision of commission.

Except as more specifically provided in this title, any person aggrieved because of any action or decision of the commission under the provisions of this title has the right to a hearing by the commission if no hearing on the matter resulting in the action or decision has been held. If a hearing has been held, the person aggrieved has the right to petition for reconsideration and to appeal, all in accordance with the provisions of chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 628, § 1; 1993, ch. 593, § 1.

61-02-77.
Emergency municipal, tribal, and rural water system drinking water grant program.

The commission may establish an emergency municipal, tribal, and rural water assistance program for municipalities, tribes, and rural water systems, whose primary source of water is the Missouri River, Lake Sakakawea, or Lake Oahe. The commission may establish procedures, cost-share guidelines, and other criteria for municipalities, tribes, and rural water systems that request emergency assistance due to low water conditions on the Missouri River, Lake Sakakawea, or Lake Oahe. The purpose of this program is to provide emergency grant funds to municipalities, tribes, and rural water systems facing a critical need or health risk as a result of the inability of the water intake system for the municipal, tribal, or rural water system to supply an adequate quantity of quality water to the people served by the municipal, tribal, or rural water system.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 554, § 1.

61-02-78.
Infrastructure revolving loan fund — Continuing appropriation — Rules. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 490, § 11; 2017, ch. 19, § 19, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 45, § 16, effective May 2, 2019; repealed by 2021, ch. 80, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

61-02-79.
Bank of North Dakota — Line of credit.

The Bank of North Dakota shall extend a line of credit not to exceed fifty million dollars at a rate of one and one-half percent over the three month London interbank offered rate, but may not exceed three percent to the state water commission. The state water commission shall repay the line of credit from funds available in the resources trust fund, water development trust fund, or other funds, as appropriated by the legislative assembly. The state water commission may access the line of credit, as necessary, to provide funding as authorized by the legislative assembly for the northwest area water supply project during the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, and ending June 30, 2023.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 54, § 32, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 19, § 20, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 45, § 17, effective May 2, 2019; 2021, ch. 20, § 7, effective April 28, 2021.

61-02-80.
Flood control projects — Financial assistance limited.

Except for flood control projects authorized by the legislative assembly or the commission before July 1, 2017, the commission shall calculate the amount of its financial assistance, including loans, grants, cost-share, and issuance of bonds, based on the needs for protection of health, property, and enterprise, against:

One hundred year flood events as determined by a federal agency;

The national economic development alternative; or

The local sponsor’s preferred alternative if the commission first determines the historical flood prevention costs and flood damages, and the risk of future flood prevention costs and flood damages, warrant protection to the level of the local sponsor’s preferred alternative.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 419, § 10, effective August 1, 2017.

61-02-81.
Development in breach inundation zones — No financial assistance for dam improvements.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a political subdivision permits building or development within a breach inundation zone and the building or development causes a change in a dam’s current hazard classification necessitating structural improvements or upgrades to the dam, the political subdivision shall pay for the necessary improvements or upgrades. State loans, grants, cost-share, and other financial assistance may not be provided to pay for the dam improvements or upgrades. For purposes of this section, “breach inundation zone” means the area downstream of the dam which would be flooded in the event of a dam failure or uncontrolled release of water.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 419, § 11, effective August 1, 2017.